Utah statutes.
23-15-14.   State Fish Hatchery Maintenance Account -- Contents -- Use of account money.

(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the State Fish Hatchery Maintenance Account.

(2)  The following money shall be deposited into the account:

(a)  $2.00 of each fishing license fee or combination license fee; and

(b)  interest and earnings on account money.

(3)  Money in the account shall be used by the division, after appropriation by the Legislature, for major repairs or replacement of facilities and equipment at fish hatcheries owned and operated by the division for the production and distribution of fish to enhance sport fishing opportunities in the state.

